Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2780.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [270B.163] DISCLOSURE OF CERTAIN CORPORATE FRANCHISE TAX INFORMATION. new text end new text begin (a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, within one month from the first day of the third calendar year following the calendar year in which a taxpayer's taxable year ends, the commissioner must make the following information available on a website: new text end new text begin (1) a corporation's corporate franchise tax return required under section 289A.18, subdivision 1; new text end new text begin (2) all corporate franchise tax forms relating to the calculation of income, apportionment, and calculation of tax; and new text end new text begin (3) the corporation's identity for state corporate franchise tax purposes. new text end new text begin (b) This section does not authorize the commissioner to disclose a corporation's federal return or federal return information. new text end new text begin (c) This section applies to a corporation required to file a return under section 289A.08, subdivision 3, that has $250,000,000 or more in aggregate gross sales or receipts in a taxable year, including a unitary business under section 290.17, subdivision 4. new text end new text begin (d) Compliance with this section by the commissioner is not a violation of this chapter. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for information required to be made available in calendar years beginning after December 31, 2025. new text end